nl: Modeltrein koppeling type: Stangkoppeling (trekstang); Europese haak-en-oogkoppeling; Hoornhaakkoppeling; Knokkelkoppeling; Schakel-en-penkoppeling; Oog-en-haakkoppeling; Magnetische knokkelkoppeling; Rapido-koppeling; Beugelkoppeling; Overig
ja: 鉄道模型用連結器タイプ: ドローバーカプラー; 欧州型フック・アンド・ループカプラー; ホーンフックカプラー; ナックルカプラー; リンク・アンド・ピンカプラー; ループ・アンド・フックカプラー; マグネティックナックルカプラー; ラピードカプラー; テンションロックカプラー; その他
da: Modeltogkoblingstype: Stangkobling; Europæisk krog- og løkkekobling; Horn-krog-kobling; Knokkelkobling; Led- og stifttilkobling; Løkke- og krogkobling; Magnetisk knokkelkobling; Rapido-kobling; Tension-lock-kobling; Andet
es: Tipo de acoplamiento para trenes de modelismo: Enganche de barra (barra de tracción); Enganche europeo de gancho y bucle; Enganche de gancho de cuerno; Enganche de nudillo; Enganche de eslabón y pasador; Enganche de bucle y gancho; Enganche de nudillo magnético; Enganche Rapido; Enganche de bloqueo por tensión; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta spojnice za modelni vlak: Polužno kvačilo (vlačno kvačilo); Europsko kvačilo s kukom i petljom; Rog-kuka kvačilo; Zglobno kvačilo; Klinasto kvačilo s karikom; Kvačilo s petljom i kukom; Magnetsko zglobno kvačilo; Rapido kvačilo; Tension-lock kvačilo; Ostalo
fr: Type d’attelage de train miniature: Attelage à barre; Attelage à boucle européen; Attelage corne-crochet; Attelage à mâchoire; Attelage à maillon et cheville; Attelage à boucle et crochet; Attelage à mâchoire magnétique; Attelage Rapido; Attelage à verrouillage par tension; Autre
sv: Typ av modelltågskoppling: Koppelstång (drawbar); Europeiskt bygelkoppel; Horn-hook-koppel; Klokoppel; Länk och sprint-koppel; Ögla-krok-koppel; Magnetiskt klokoppel; Rapido-koppel; Tension-lock-koppel; Annat
pt-BR: Trem de modelismo tipo de engate: Engate tipo barra; Engate tipo gancho e alça europeu; Engate tipo chifre e gancho; Engate tipo mandíbula (knuckle); Engate de elo e pino; Engate de alça e gancho; Engate magnético tipo mandíbula; Engate Rapido; Engate de trava por tensão; Outro
ru: Тип сцепки модели поезда: Сцепка-тяга; Накидная петля (европейского типа); Рожковая сцепка; Кулачковая сцепка; Звеньевая сцепка; Сцепка типа петля-крюк; Магнитная автосцепка; Сцепка Rapido; Сцепка с замком натяжения (Tension-lock); Другое
pl: Typ sprzęgu kolejki modelarskiej: Sprzęg sztywny (belkowy); Europejski sprzęg oczkowy; Sprzęg typu Horn-Hook; Sprzęg kłowy (typu knuckle); Sprzęg trzpieniowy (link-and-pin); Sprzęg oczkowy; Magnetyczny sprzęg kłowy; Sprzęg Rapido; Sprzęg napinany (tension-lock); Inny
ko: 모형 기차 연결기 유형: 바(드로우바) 커플러; 유럽형 훅 앤 루프 커플러; 혼 훅 커플러; 너클 커플러; 링크 앤 핀 커플러; 루프 앤 훅 커플러; 자석 너클 커플러; 라피도 커플러; 텐션 락 커플러; 기타
zh-TW: 模型火車連結器類型: 桿狀 (牽引桿) 連結器; 歐式鉤環連結器; 牛角鉤連結器; 關節式連結器; 鏈接與插銷連結器; 環鉤連結器; 磁性關節式連結器; Rapido 連結器; 張力鎖定連結器; 其他
zh-CN: 模型火车耦合器类型: 杆式（牵引杆）车钩; 欧式勾环车钩; 钩角车钩; 转向节车钩; 链环式车钩; 环钩式车钩; 磁性转向节车钩; Rapido 车钩; 张力锁车钩; 其他
bg-BG: Тип куплунг за моделeн влак: Теглич (drawbar); Европейски куплеж с кука и примка; Куплеж с кука и рог (horn-hook); Шарнирен куплеж; Куплеж с щифт и звено; Куплеж с примка и кука; Магнитен шарнирен куплеж; Rapido куплеж; Куплеж с обтягащо заключване; Друго
cs: Typ spřáhla pro modelový vlak: Tyčové spřáhlo; Evropské očkové spřáhlo; Hákové spřáhlo; Automatické (čelisťové) spřáhlo; Čepové spřáhlo; Očkové spřáhlo; Magnetické čelisťové spřáhlo; Spřáhlo Rapido; Třmenové spřáhlo; Jiné
lt-LT: Modelinio traukinio sukabintuvo tipas: Strypinė (traukės) sankaba; Europinė kablio ir kilpos sankaba; Raginė ir kablinė sankaba; Krumplinė sankaba; Grandininė-kaištinė sankaba; Kilpos ir kablio sankaba; Magnetinė krumplinė sankaba; „Rapido“ sankaba; Tempimo-fiksavimo sankaba; Kita
sk-SK: Typ spriahadla modelárskeho vlaku: Tyčové spriahadlo; Európske hákové spriahadlo (strmeňové); Spriahadlo Horn-Hook (X2F); Čeľusťové spriahadlo; Spriahadlo Link-and-Pin (čapové); Očkové a hákové spriahadlo; Magnetické čeľusťové spriahadlo; Spriahadlo Rapido; Spriahadlo Tension-lock; Iné
tr: Model tren kaplin tipi: Çubuk (çeki demiri) kuplör; Avrupa tipi kanca ve halka kuplör; Boynuzlu kanca kuplör; Eklem kuplör; Bağlantı ve pim kuplör; Halka ve kanca kuplör; Manyetik eklem kuplör; Rapido kuplör; Gergi kilitli kuplör; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul cuplei pentru trenuri de modelism: Cuplaj cu bară (tijă de tracțiune); Cuplaj european cu cârlig și buclă; Cuplaj X2f (horn-hook); Cuplaj cu articulație; Cuplaj cu za și bolț; Cuplaj cu buclă și cârlig; Cuplaj cu articulație magnetic; Cuplaj Rapido; Cuplaj cu blocare prin tensiune; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de engate para comboios em miniatura: Acoplador de barra (barra de tração); Acoplador europeu de gancho e laço; Acoplador de chifre e gancho; Acoplador de articulação; Acoplador de elo e pino; Acoplador de laço e gancho; Acoplador magnético de articulação; Acoplador Rapido; Acoplador de bloqueio de tensão; Outro
fi: Pienoismallijunan kytkintyyppi: Tankokytkin (vetotanko); Eurooppalainen lenkkikytkin; Horn-hook-kytkin; Rystyskytkin; Tappi- ja lenkkikytkin; Lenkki- ja koukkukytkin; Magneettinen rystyskytkin; Rapido-kytkin; Jännityslukkokytkin; Muu
nb: Type kobling for modelltog: Stangkobling; Europeisk krok- og løkkekobling; Horn-krok-kobling; Klokobling; Lenke- og pinnekobling; Løkke- og krokkobling; Magnetisk klokobling; Rapido-kobling; Tension-lock-kobling; Annet
hu: Modellvasút-kapcsoló típusa: Rúd (vonórúd) kapcsoló; Európai horog- és hurokkapcsoló; Kürt-horog kapcsoló; Csuklós kapcsoló; Lánc- és csapos kapcsoló; Hurok- és horogkapcsoló; Mágneses csuklós kapcsoló; Rapido kapcsoló; Feszítőzáras kapcsoló; Egyéb
en: Model train coupler type: Bar (drawbar) coupler; European hook-and-loop coupler; Horn-hook coupler; Knuckle coupler; Link-and-pin coupler; Loop-and-hook coupler; Magnetic knuckle coupler; Rapido coupler; Tension-lock coupler; Other
de: Modellbahnkupplungstyp: Stangenkupplung; Bügelkupplung; Horn-Hook-Kupplung; Klauenkupplung; Trichterkupplung; Haken-und-Ösen-Kupplung; Magnet-Klauenkupplung; Rapido-Kupplung; Tension-Lock-Kupplung; Sonstige
it: Tipo di gancio per modellismo ferroviario: Gancio a barra (drawbar); Gancio europeo a occhiello; Gancio a uncino; Gancio a snodo; Gancio a perno e maglia; Gancio a occhiello; Gancio a snodo magnetico; Gancio Rapido; Gancio a dente di arresto; Altro
vi: Khớp nối mô hình tàu hỏa: Khớp nối thanh (thanh kéo); Khớp nối móc và vòng kiểu châu Âu; Khớp nối kiểu móc sừng; Khớp nối khớp ngón tay; Khớp nối mắt xích và chốt; Khớp nối vòng và móc; Khớp nối khớp ngón tay từ tính; Khớp nối Rapido; Khớp nối khóa căng; Khác
el: Τύπος ζεύκτη μοντέλου τρένου: Σύνδεσμος ράβδου (drawbar); Ευρωπαϊκός σύνδεσμος άγκιστρου-θηλιάς; Σύνδεσμος horn-hook; Αρθρωτός σύνδεσμος (knuckle); Σύνδεσμος τύπου κρίκου και πείρου; Σύνδεσμος τύπου θηλιάς και άγκιστρου; Μαγνητικός αρθρωτός σύνδεσμος (knuckle); Σύνδεσμος Rapido; Σύνδεσμος ασφάλισης υπό τάση (tension-lock); Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta sklopke modela vlaka: Sklopka z drogom (vlečnim drogom); Evropska sklopka s kavljem in zanko; Sklopka z rogatim kavljem; Členkasta sklopka; Sklopka s sornikom; Sklopka z zanko in kavljem; Magnetna členkasta sklopka; Sklopka Rapido; Sklopka z nateznim zapiranjem; Drugo
th: ประเภทข้อต่อรถไฟจำลอง: ข้อต่อแบบคานลาก (Drawbar); ข้อต่อแบบตะขอและห่วงสไตล์ยุโรป; ข้อต่อแบบ Horn-Hook; ข้อต่อแบบ Knuckle; ข้อต่อแบบ Link-and-Pin; ข้อต่อแบบ Loop-and-Hook; ข้อต่อแม่เหล็กแบบ Knuckle; ข้อต่อแบบ Rapido; ข้อต่อแบบ Tension-Lock; อื่นๆ